Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-211 Duties and powers of the
commissioner. [(a)] In addition to the duties and powers enumerated
elsewhere in this part, the commissioner shall:

(1) Upon request of the board of directors, provide
the association with a statement of the premiums in this and any other
appropriate states for each member insurer;

(2) When an impairment is declared and the amount of
the impairment is determined, serve a demand upon the impaired insurer to make
good the impairment within a reasonable time; notice to the impaired insurer
shall constitute notice to its shareholders, if any; the failure of the insurer
to promptly comply with such demand shall not excuse the association from the
performance of its powers and duties under this part;

(3) In any liquidation or rehabilitation proceeding
involving a domestic insurer, be appointed as the liquidator or rehabilitator.

(b) The commissioner may suspend or revoke,
after notice and hearing, the certificate of authority to transact insurance in
this State of any member insurer which fails to pay an assessment when due or
fails to comply with the plan of operation. As an alternative the commissioner
may levy a forfeiture on any member insurer which fails to pay an assessment
when due. Such forfeiture shall not exceed five per cent of the unpaid
assessment per month, but no forfeiture shall be less than $100 per month.

(c) Any action of the board of directors or
the association may be appealed to the commissioner by any member insurer if
such appeal is taken within sixty days of the final action being appealed. If
a member insurer is appealing an assessment, the amount assessed shall be paid
to the association and available to meet association obligations during the
pendency of an appeal. If the appeal on the assessment is upheld, the amount
paid in error or excess shall be returned to the member insurer. Any final
action or order of the commissioner shall be subject to judicial review in the
circuit court of the first judicial circuit.

(d) The liquidator, rehabilitator or
conservator of any impaired insurer may notify all interested persons of the
effect of this part. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 122, §75]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next